District of Columbia statutes.
42-1904.06

Application for registration — Notice of filing; registration or rejection; notice of need for rejection; hearing.

(a)

Upon receipt of the application for registration in proper form, the Mayor shall, within 5 business days, issue a notice of filing to the applicant. Within 60 days from the date of the notice of filing, the Mayor shall enter an order registering the condominium or rejecting the registration. If no order of rejection is entered within 60 days from the date of notice of filing, the condominium shall be deemed registered unless the applicant has consented in writing to a delay.

(b)

If the Mayor affirmatively determines, upon inquiry and examination, that the requirements of § 42-1904.05 have been met, he shall enter an order registering the condominium and may require any additions, deletions, or modifications in and to the public offering statement in order to assure full and fair disclosure.

(c)

If the Mayor determines upon inquiry and examination, that any of the requirements of § 42-1904.05 have not been met, he shall notify the applicant that the application for registration must be corrected in the particulars specified within 15 days or such longer period as he may prescribe. If the requirements are not met within the time allowed the Mayor shall enter an order rejecting the registration which shall include the findings of fact upon which the order is based. The order rejecting the registration shall not become effective for 20 days after the lapse of the aforesaid period during which 20-day period the applicant may petition for reconsideration and shall be entitled to a hearing to contest the particulars specified in the Mayor’s notice. Such order of rejection shall not take effect during the pendency of a hearing, if requested.

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-89, title IV, § 406, 23 DCR 9532b
Rental housing conversion and sale, applicability to prior housing accommodations conversions, see § 42-3402.11.
Rental housing conversion and sale, condominium conversion as issuance of notice of filing pursuant to this section, see § 42-3401.03.
This section is referenced in § 42-1903.02, § 42-1904.01, § 42-1904.16, § 42-3401.03, and § 42-3402.11.
1981 Ed., § 45-1866.
1973 Ed., § 5-1266.